Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 6
CONDUCT OF ELECTIONS

31-10-601. Hours of voting.

At all elections held under this article, the polls shall be opened at 7 a.m. and remain open until 7 p.m. of the same day. If a full set of judges of election do not attend at the hour of 7 a.m., an alternate election judge shall be appointed as provided in section 31-10-405. The polls shall be opened if a majority of judges are present, even though the alternate judge has not arrived. Every person, otherwise qualified to vote, who is standing in line waiting to vote at 7 p.m. shall be permitted to vote.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1048, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1502, § 18, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-601 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-602. Watchers at municipal elections.

Each candidate for office, or interested party in case of an issue, at a municipal election is entitled to appoint some person to act in his behalf in every precinct in which he is a candidate or in which the issue is on the ballot. Such candidate or interested party shall certify the names of the persons so appointed to the clerk on forms provided by the clerk. In case a watcher must leave the polling place, he may designate an alternate to act in his behalf while he is absent, if such alternate is made known to the election judges by an affidavit of the person first named as a watcher.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1048, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-602 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-603. Employee entitled to vote.

Any registered elector entitled to vote at any municipal election held within this state is entitled to absent himself from any service or employment in which he is then engaged or employed on the day of such election for a period of two hours between the time of opening and time of closing the polls. Any such absence shall not be sufficient reason for the discharge of any such person from such service or employment. Such elector, because of so absenting himself, shall not be liable to any penalty, nor shall any deduction be made from his usual salary or wages on account of such absence. Registered electors who are employed and paid by the hour shall receive their regular hourly wage for the period of such absence, not to exceed two hours. Application shall be made for such leave of absence prior to the day of election. The employer may specify the hours during which such employee may absent himself, but such hours shall be at the beginning or ending of the work shift if the employee so requests.

This section shall not apply to any person whose hours of employment on the day of the election are such that there are three or more hours between the time of opening and the time of closing of the polls during which he is not employed on the job.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1049, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(2) amended, p. 1185, § 1, effective April 25.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-603 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-604. Judges open ballot box first.

In precincts which use an electronic voting system or paper ballots, it is the duty of the judges of the election, immediately before the opening of the polls, to open the ballot box in the presence of the people there assembled and turn it upside down so as to empty it of everything that may be in it and then lock it securely. It shall not be reopened until the time for counting the ballots therein.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1049, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-604 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-605. Judge to keep pollbook.

A judge of election shall keep a pollbook, which shall contain one column headed "names of voters" and one column headed "number on ballot". The name and number on the ballot of each registered elector voting shall be entered in regular succession under the headings in the pollbook.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1049, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1502, § 19, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-605 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-606. Preparing to vote.

Any registered elector desiring to vote shall write his name and address on a form available at the polling place and shall give the form to one of the judges of election, who shall thereupon announce the same clearly and audibly. If said elector is unable to write, he may request assistance from one of the judges of election, and such judge must sign the form and witness the elector's mark. The form to be available shall be in substance: "I, ...., who reside at ...., am a registered elector of this precinct and desire to vote at this .... election. Date .....". If the name is found on the registration book or the registration list by the election judge having charge thereof, he shall likewise repeat the name, and said elector shall be allowed to enter the immediate voting area. If the name is not found on the registration book or the registration list by the election judge, such election judge, if practicable and not unduly disruptive to the election process, shall attempt to contact the county clerk and recorder's office, by telephone or otherwise, to request oral verification of the elector's registration in that precinct; and, if such oral verification is received by such election judge from the county clerk and recorder's office, such election judge shall record such verification on a form to be provided by the clerk and shall likewise repeat the elector's name, and said elector shall be allowed to enter the immediate voting area. After it is determined that the elector is duly registered, the election official in charge of the pollbook shall write upon the pollbook the name of such elector and, in precincts using paper ballots, the number of the ballot given to such elector.

Besides the election officials, not more than four voters in excess of the number of voting booths or voting machines shall be allowed within the immediate voting area at one time.

The completed signature forms shall be returned with other election materials to the clerk. If no challenges have been made, the forms may be destroyed after forty-five days.

If the judges are using the registration book and the registered elector's signature does not appear on his or her registration record, said elector shall show documentation of his or her registration and sign his or her registration record before being allowed to vote. If said elector is unable to write, he or she may request assistance from one of the judges of election, and such judge shall sign the registration record and witness said elector's mark.

In precincts using paper ballots, an election judge shall give the registered elector one, and only one, ballot, which shall be removed from the package of ballots by tearing the same along the perforated line between the stub and duplicate stub. Before delivering such ballot to said elector, the judge of election having charge of the ballots shall endorse his initials on the duplicate stub, and said judge shall enter the date and the number of said ballot on the registration book or registration list opposite the name of said elector.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1049, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 1177, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(1) and (5) amended, p. 1503, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(4) amended, p. 640, § 86, effective May 1.

L. 2014:

(4) amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 61, § 19, effective February 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-606 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

31-10-607. Manner of voting in precincts which use paper ballots.

In precincts which use paper ballots, upon receiving his ballot, the registered elector shall immediately retire alone to one of the voting booths provided and shall prepare his ballot by marking or stamping in ink or indelible pencil, in the appropriate margin or place, a cross mark (X) opposite the name of the candidate of his choice for each office to be filled; except that no cross mark (X) shall be required opposite the name of a write-in candidate. In case of a question submitted to a vote of the people, said elector shall mark or stamp, in the appropriate margin or place, a cross mark (X) opposite the answer which he desires to give. Before leaving the voting booth, said elector shall fold his ballot without displaying the marks thereon, so that the contents of the ballot are concealed and the stub can be removed without exposing any of the contents of the ballot, and he shall keep the same so folded until he has deposited his ballot in the ballot box.

Each registered elector who has prepared his ballot and is ready to cast his vote shall then leave the voting booth and approach the judge of election having charge of the ballot box. He shall give his name to that judge, who shall announce the name of such elector and the number upon the duplicate stub of his ballot, which number must correspond with the stub number previously placed on the registration book or registration list. If the stub number of the ballot corresponds and is identified by the initials of the judge of election placed thereupon, the judge of election shall then remove the duplicate stub from such ballot. Such ballot shall then be returned to the registered elector, who shall thereupon, in full view of the judges of election, cast his vote by depositing the ballot in the ballot box, with the official endorsement on said ballot uppermost.

Each registered elector shall mark and deposit his ballot without undue delay and shall leave the immediate voting area as soon as he has voted. No such elector shall occupy a voting booth already occupied by another, nor remain within the immediate voting area more than ten minutes, nor occupy a voting booth for more than five minutes if all such booths are in use and other voters are waiting to occupy the same. No registered elector whose name has been entered on the pollbook shall be allowed to reenter the immediate voting area during the election except a judge of election.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1050, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(2) amended, p. 1178, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 1503, § 21, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-607 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-608. Disabled voter - assistance.

If, at any regular or special election, any voter declares under oath to the judges of election of the precinct where he is entitled to vote that, by reason of blindness or other physical disability or inability to read or write, he is unable to prepare his ballot or operate the voting machine without assistance, he is entitled, upon his request, to receive the assistance of any one of the judges of election or, at his option, of any qualified elector of the precinct selected by the disabled voter. No person other than a judge of election in the precinct is permitted to enter the polling booth as an assistant to more than one voter.

A notation shall be made in the pollbook opposite the name of each voter thus assisted stating that the voter has been assisted.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1051, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 1504, § 22, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-608 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-609. Spoiled ballots.

In precincts which use an electronic voting system or paper ballots, no person shall take or remove any ballot from the polling place before the close of the polls. If any voter spoils a ballot, he may successively obtain others, one at a time, not exceeding three in all, upon returning each spoiled one. The spoiled ballots thus returned shall be immediately canceled and shall be preserved and returned to the clerk along with other election records and supplies.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1051, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-609 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-610. Counting paper ballots.

In precincts which use paper ballots, as soon as the polls at any election have finally closed, the judges shall immediately open the ballot box and proceed to count the votes polled, and the counting thereof shall be continued until finished before the judges of election adjourn. They shall first count the number of ballots in the box. If the ballots are found to exceed the number of names entered on the pollbook, the judges of election shall then examine the official endorsements upon the outside of the ballots without opening the same, and if, in the unanimous opinion of the judges, any of the ballots in excess of the number on the pollbook do not bear the proper official endorsement, they shall be put into a separate pile by themselves, and a separate record and return of the votes in such ballots shall be made under the head of "excess ballots". When the ballots and the pollbook agree, the judges of election shall proceed to count the votes. Each ballot shall be read and counted separately, and every name separately marked as voted for on such ballot, where there is no conflict to obscure the intention of the voter, shall be read and marked upon the tally sheets before any other ballot is proceeded with. The entire number of ballots, excepting "excess ballots", shall be read and counted and placed upon the tally sheets in like manner. When all of the ballots, excepting "excess ballots", have been counted, the judges of election shall estimate and publish the votes.

When all the votes have been read and counted, the ballots, together with one of the tally lists, shall be returned to the ballot box, and the opening shall be carefully sealed, and each of the judges shall place his initials on said seal. The cover shall then be locked and the ballot box delivered to the clerk as provided in section 31-10-614.

All persons, except judges of election and watchers, shall be excluded from the place where the counting is being carried on until the count has been completed.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1051, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 1504, § 23, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-610 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-611. Tally sheets.

As the judges of election open and read the ballots, the votes each of the candidates have received shall be carefully marked down, upon tally sheets prepared by the clerk for that purpose, by any appropriate election official.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1052, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1178, § 19, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-611 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-612. Defective ballots.

If a voter marks in ink or indelible pencil more names than there are persons to be elected to an office or if, for any reason, it is impossible to determine the choice of any voter for any office to be filled, his ballot shall not be counted for such office. A defective or an incomplete cross marked on any ballot in ink in a proper place shall be counted if there is no other mark or cross in ink or indelible pencil on such ballot indicating an intention to vote for some person other than those indicated by the first mentioned defective cross or mark. No ballot without the official endorsement, except as provided in section 31-10-805, shall be deposited in the ballot box, and none but ballots provided in accordance with the provisions of this article shall be counted. When the judges of election in any precinct discover in the counting of votes that the name of any candidate voted for is misspelled or the initial letters of his given name are transposed or omitted in part or altogether on the ballot, the vote for such candidate shall be counted for him if the intention of the elector to vote for him is apparent. Ballots not counted shall be marked "defective" on the back thereof and shall be preserved for such time as is provided in section 31-10-616 for ballots and destroyed as therein directed.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1052, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-612 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-613. Judges' certificate.

As soon as all the votes have been read and counted, the judges of election shall make a certificate, stating the name of each candidate, designating the office for which such person received votes, and stating the number of votes he received, the number being expressed in words at full length and in numerical figures, such entry to be made as nearly as circumstances will admit, in the following form:

In addition, the judges of election shall make a statement in writing showing the number of ballots voted, making a separate statement of the number of unofficial and substitute ballots voted, the number of ballots delivered to voters, the number of spoiled ballots, the number of ballots not delivered to voters, and the number of ballots returned, identifying and specifying the same. All unused ballots, spoiled ballots, and stubs of ballots voted shall be returned with such statement.

"At an election held at .... in .... precinct in the municipality of .... and state of Colorado, on the .... day of ...., in the year ...., the following named persons received the number of votes annexed to their respective names for the following described offices: Total number of votes cast were ...., A.B. had seventy-two (72) votes for mayor; C.D. had seventy-one (71) votes for mayor; N.O. had seventy-two (72) votes for councilman or trustee; P.Q. had seventy-one (71) votes for councilman or trustee (and in the same manner for any other persons voted for).

Certified by us:

E.F.)Judges
)
G.H.)of
)
I.J.)Election"

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1052, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 1178, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 1504, § 24, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-613 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-614. Delivery of election returns, ballot boxes, and other election papers.

When all the votes have been read and counted, the election officials selected in accordance with section 31-10-409 shall deliver to the clerk the certificate and statement required by section 31-10-613, the ballot boxes and all keys thereto, and the registration list, pollbooks, tally sheets, spoiled ballots, unused ballots, ballot stubs, oaths, affidavits, and other election papers and supplies. Such delivery shall be made at once and with all convenient speed, and informality in such delivery shall not invalidate the vote of any precinct when delivery has been made previous to the completion of the official abstract of the votes by the canvassers. The clerk shall give his receipt for all such papers so delivered.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1053, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-614 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-615. Judges to post returns.

In addition to all certificates otherwise required to be made of the count of votes polled at any election, the judges of election are hereby required to make out an abstract of the count of votes, which abstract shall contain the names of the offices, names of the candidates, ballot titles and submission clauses of all initiated, referred, or other measures voted upon, and the number of votes counted for or against each candidate or measure. Said abstract shall be posted in a conspicuous place upon the outside of the polling place immediately upon completion of the count. The abstract may be removed at any time after forty-eight hours following the election. Suitable blanks for the required abstract shall be prepared, printed, and furnished to all judges of election at the same time and in the same manner as other election supplies are furnished.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1053, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-615 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-616. Preservation of ballots and election records.

The ballots, when not required to be taken from the ballot box for the purpose of election contests, shall remain in the ballot box in the custody of the clerk until six months after the election at which such ballots were cast or until the time has expired for which the ballots would be needed in any contest proceedings, at which time the ballot box shall be opened by the clerk and the ballots destroyed by fire, shredding, or burial, or by any other method approved by the executive director of the department of personnel. If the ballot boxes are needed for a special election before the legal time for commencing any proceedings in the way of contests has elapsed or in case such clerk, at the time of holding such special election, has knowledge of the pendency of any contest in which the ballots would be needed, the clerk shall preserve the ballots in some secure manner and provide for their being kept so that no one can ascertain how any voter may have voted.

The clerk shall preserve all other official election records and forms for at least six months following a regular or special election.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1053, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 1179, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 1543, § 135, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-616 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-617. Ranked voting methods.

Notwithstanding any provision of this article to the contrary, a municipality may use a ranked voting method, as defined in section 1-1-104 (34.4), C.R.S., to conduct a regular election to elect the mayor or members of the governing body of the municipality in accordance with section 1-7-1003, C.R.S., and the rules adopted by the secretary of state pursuant to section 1-7-1004 (1), C.R.S.

A municipality conducting an election using a ranked voting method may adapt the requirements of this article, including requirements concerning the form of the ballot, the method of marking the ballot, the procedure for counting ballots, and the form of the election judges' certificate, as necessary for compatibility with the ranked voting method.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 1252, § 4, effective August 5.